Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
“Therefore, the State Corporation Commission (Commission) shall submit a report to the General Assembly, no later than May 1, 2022, recommending policy proposals that could govern public electric utility programs to accelerate widespread transportation
electrification in the Commonwealth. To guide policy proposal development, the Commission shall utilize a public process, in which the Commission, the Department of Environmental Quality, the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy,
the Department of Transportation, and appropriate stakeholders shall participate. The Commission shall identify and retain a third-party facilitator with expertise in transportation electrification to facilitate such public process.

“In developing its policy recommendations, the Commission shall evaluate, among other things:

“1. Areas where utility or other public investment may best complement private efforts to effectively deploy charging infrastructure, with particular focus on low-income, minority, and rural communities;

“2. How smart growth policies can complement and enhance the Commonwealth’s transportation electrification goals; and

“3. How utility programs, investments, or incentives to customers or third parties to facilitate the deployment of charging infrastructure and related upgrades can support or enhance (i) statewide transportation electrification, including electrification
of public transit; (ii) the electrification of medium-duty and heavy-duty vehicles, school buses, vehicles at ports and airports, personal vehicles, and vehicle fleets; (iii) increased access to electric transportation and improved
air quality in low-income and medium-income communities; (iv) achievement of the energy storage targets established in subsection E of § 56-585.5 of the Code of Virginia; (v) improvements to the distribution grid or to specific sites
necessary to accommodate charging infrastructure; and (vi) customer education and outreach programs that increase awareness of such programs and the benefits of transportation electrification.

“The report shall also address whether and how transportation electrification can, under current law:

“a. Reduce total ratepayer rates and costs;

“b. Assist in grid management and more efficient use of the grid, in a manner that does not increase peak demand, through time-of-use rates, managed charging programs, vehicle-to-grid programs, or other alternative rate designs;

“c. Utilize increased generation from renewable energy resources; and

“d. Reduce fueling costs for vehicles.

“To the extent that the Commission and stakeholders conclude that transportation electrification cannot currently deliver these benefits, then the report shall include recommendations on how public policy can change in order to do so.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 268, cl. 1, § 2 was codified as § 56-585.1:13.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

Acts 2022, c. 169, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C of § 56-585.5 of the Code of Virginia, any Phase I Utility or Phase II Utility, as such terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia,
shall, for renewable energy portfolio standard (RPS) program compliance years 2023 and 2024, prioritize procurement of renewable energy certificates (RECs) from renewable energy standard sources (RPS eligible sources) located in the
Commonwealth, provided that such RECs are cost-competitive when compared with out-of-state sources at the time of procurement. Additionally, to promote economic development in the counties and cities eligible for funding through the
Tobacco Commission Region Revitalization Commission, each utility shall include in its annual filing for RPS program compliance years 2023 and 2024 a plan for prioritizing procurement of RECs from RPS eligible sources that are both
(i) cost-competitive and (ii) eligible for the Virginia Brownfield and Coal Mine Renewable Energy Grant Fund and Program established pursuant to §

45.2-1725

of the Code of Virginia.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 140, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision G 1, added “including any contract with a utility for such generation resources that does not allocate to or recover from any other customer of the utility the cost of such
resources” in the first sentence, rewrote the former second sentence as the second and third sentences by deleting “however” at the end of the second sentence and adding “however, an accelerated renewable energy buyer that is a customer
of a Phase II Utility and was subscribed, as of March 1, 2020, to a voluntary companion experimental tariff offering of the utility for the purchase of renewable attributes from renewable energy facilities that requires a renewable
facilities agreement and the purchase of a minimum of 2,000 renewable attributes annually, shall be exempt from allocation of the net costs related to procurement of new solar or onshore wind generation capacity, energy, or environmental
attributes, or energy storage facilities, by the utility pursuant to subsections D and E, based on the amount of RECs associated with the customer’s renewable facilities agreements associated with such tariff offering as of that date
in proportion to the customer’s total electric energy consumption, on an annual basis” at the end of the third sentence.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 328, effective July 1, 2021, added the second paragraph in subdivision D 5.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, in subsection A in the definition for “Previously developed project site” and twice in subsection D 5, substituted “Department of Energy” for “Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”